Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Wyoming Partnership Challenge Loan Program

§ 9-12-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Business” means any proposed or existing enterprise which employs people within the state, provides services within the state, uses resources within the state or otherwise adds economic value to goods, services or resources within the state, and includes farm and ranch operations;

“Community development organization” means a group of private citizens organized as a business entity authorized to do business in this state for the purpose of providing financing for new, existing, or expanding businesses and other economic or community development purposes throughout its community or county, and which may take equity positions and shall take security positions in its borrowers’ businesses and appropriate personal guarantees from the owners thereof;

“Economic development account” means the economic development enterprise account within the revolving investment fund created under article XVI, section 12 of the Wyoming constitution. The account shall consist of funds from payments as provided in W.S.

9-12-305

and other funds as provided by law;

“State development organization” means a corporation organized under W.S.

17-11-101

through

17-11-120

with the authority to provide financing for new, existing or expanding businesses and to fulfill other economic or community development purposes throughout the state of Wyoming, and which may take equity positions and shall take security positions in its borrowers’ businesses and appropriate personal guarantees from the owners thereof;

“Economic disaster” means an event occurring in Wyoming that has an economic impact with total lost revenues to impacted businesses in a twelve (12) calendar month period of at least four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) or an economic impact with total lost revenues to impacted businesses in four (4) or less counties in a twelve (12) calendar month period of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000.00). The business council may use good faith estimates of lost revenues to businesses in determining whether an event qualifies as an economic disaster. Calculation of lost revenues shall only include actual losses incurred and shall not include any future losses;

“Fifty-fifty (50-50) financing program” means the provision of financing for that portion of the total project cost that is calculated by subtracting from the total project cost the sum of the business’s debt. The council shall not consider a proposal in which the fifty-fifty (50-50) financing component exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the total project cost or two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00), whichever is less, and the business does not contribute more than fifteen percent (15%) of the total project cost;

“Guarantee loan participation” means a provision of financing by the council in which the council participates with a lender that has secured a federal guaranteed loan to guarantee repayment of a loan made to a business. The maximum participation by the council shall be fifty percent (50%) of the loan or two million dollars ($2,000,000.00), whichever is less. The council shall not participate in a new guarantee loan participation under this article on and after July 1, 2022 as provided in W.S. 9-12-304(e);

“Loan guarantee” means a provision of financing by the council in which the council guarantees a portion of a bank loan made to a business. The council shall not issue a loan guarantee under this article on and after July 1, 2022 as provided in W.S. 9-12-304(f);

“Wyoming main street loan participation” means a provision of financing by the council in which the council participates with a lender that has made a loan to a business for building improvements to maintain the structure’s historical character. The maximum participation by the council shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the loan or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), whichever is less;

“Natural gas fueling infrastructure loan” means a loan issued by the council for the costs of the engineering, design, real property, equipment and labor necessary to install a functioning natural gas filling station to fuel motor vehicles which operate on natural gas as a transportation fuel;

“Contract financing” means a provision of financing for a business to gain liquidity and in which the business assigns the proceeds of a valid contract as collateral for the financing;

“Succession financing” means a provision of financing to be used to assist in the transition or succession of a business that has been in existence for not less than seven (7) years immediately before the transfer or succession to a new owner of the business.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-10-101

; 1998, ch. 6, §§ 4, 5; ch. 36, § 1; 2000, ch. 22, § 1; 2001, ch. 13, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 28, § 1; 2005, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 8, § 1; 2013 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(vii) and (a)(viii).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 249, § 1, substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00)” in (a)(v).

Laws 2005, ch. 249, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2005.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

9-12-305

” for “W.S.

9-12-306

” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), whichever is less” in (a)(vi); in (a)(vii), substituted “lender” for “bank” and “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)”; and added (a)(ix).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(x).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(vi), substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for
“five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)” and substituted “two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)” for “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” in (a)(vii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(vi), in the first sentence, substituted “Fifty-fifty (50-50)” for “Bridge,” added “program” preceding “means the” substituted “that” for “which,” added “the” following “subtracting from,” substituted “the business's” for “ownership,” deleted “and equity” at the end, in the second sentence, substituted “fifty-fifty (50-50)” for “bridge,” “fifty percent (50%)” for “thirty-five percent (35%)”, added “the” preceding “total project cost or,” substituted “two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00)” for “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)”; added the last sentence in (a)(vii); added the last sentence in (a)(viii); and added (a)(xi) and (a)(xii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-12-302.
Wyoming partnership challenge loan program; creation; rulemaking; administration account.

The council shall establish and administer a partnership challenge loan program under this article and may contract for necessary professional services. Loans authorized under the program shall be limited, except as otherwise provided under W.S.

9-12-304

(c) through (k), to community development organizations and state development organizations and made in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

9-12-304

. Any community development organization or state development organization may submit an application to the council to participate in the program on forms prescribed by and subject to rules promulgated by the council.

The council shall establish all fees and interest rates to be charged for each loan as it is underwritten for this program. The interest rate for loans made under this program shall be not less than three percent (3%) per annum. Fees on loans under the program shall be paid monthly and deposited into a program administration account which is continuously appropriated to the council to be expended solely for the purpose of administering this article and loans authorized under it.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-10-102; 1998, ch. 6, § 4, 5; ch. 36, § 1; 2000, ch. 22, § 1; 2001, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 8, § 1; 2013 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, updated an internal reference to §

9-12-304

in (a).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “program administration account.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “(g)” for “(f)” in the second sentence of (a).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “(h)” for “(g)” following “9-12-304(c) through” in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “three percent (3%)” for “four percent (4%).”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “(k)” for “(h)” in the second sentence of (a).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 9, § 1, provides: “(a) There is appropriated from the general fund two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the economic development account, as defined in W.S. 9 12 301(a)(iii), within the revolving investment fund created under article 16, section 12 of the Wyoming constitution, to be used as specified in W.S. 9 12 302.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-12-303.
Council duties; actions on loan applications.

All complete applications to participate in the loan program established under this article which conform with the criteria established by law and rules promulgated under this article which are submitted to the council shall be considered by the council. The council shall review the application and may communicate directly with the applicant and other lenders or potential lenders of the applicant. The council shall approve or disapprove each application it considers in accordance with this article and rules promulgated under it. In making its determination under this section, the council shall consider whether approval of the application would cause unfair competition with any existing business in the area. The council shall establish loan amortization schedules, terms and conditions for each loan approved.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-10-104

; 1998, ch. 6, § 4.

§ 9-12-304.
Criteria for loans.

Except as otherwise provided under subsections (c) through (k) of this section, loans under this article may only be made by the council to community development organizations and state development organizations which meet the following eligibility criteria:

The community development organization or state development organization will contribute an amount of cash or cash equivalent not less than twenty percent (20%) of the loan it receives under this article to a program of investment in its area of local economic development;

The community development organization or state development organization will consolidate the loan it receives under this article and its required contribution under paragraph (i) of this subsection and make loans to Wyoming businesses and investments in support of Wyoming businesses, such as infrastructure construction loans and occupational training loans;

The community development organization has been endorsed by a resolution of the legislative body of its municipality or county or, in the case of a state development organization, has been endorsed by a resolution of the council; and

As part of any agreement under this article and to ensure funds loaned or committed under this section are invested by the community development organization or the state development organization in local economic development in a reasonable period of time, the council shall reserve the right to terminate the agreement.

Loans, loan commitments or loan guarantees or any combination thereof shall be made under this article only:

If the total amount to:

A single community development organization, or to a business for an economic disaster loan as provided under subsection (c) of this section, does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00);

A business for fifty-fifty (50-50) financing as provided under subsection (d) of this section does not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the total project cost, whichever is less;

State development organizations does not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000.00);

A business for a Wyoming main street loan participation as provided under subsection (g) of this section does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

A business for a natural gas fueling infrastructure loan as provided under subsection (h) of this section does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total project cost or one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), whichever is less;

A business for a contract financing loan as provided under subsection (j) of this section does not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00); or

A business for a succession financing loan as provided under subsection (k) of this section does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).

If there are sufficient funds in the economic development enterprise account to fully fund it and all other outstanding commitments, loans, loan guarantees and guarantee loan participations;

If funds provided by the state are adequately collateralized. The adequacy of the collateral shall be determined by the council;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 208.

Any business or group of businesses may apply to the council for designation of an area of this state as an area in which an economic disaster as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(v) has occurred. The council shall prescribe the form and contents of such applications. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable as to whether an economic disaster area designation shall be made. The council may make loans to any business located within the designated economic disaster area that has lost revenue as a result of the economic disaster. Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to economic disaster loans under this subsection.

Any business may apply to the council for fifty-fifty (50-50) financing as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(vi). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. In the event of a default for any loan made under this subsection, liability shall be shared proportionately between the state and the lending institution in the same percentage as the source of the loan. The interest of the state and the lending institution shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the bridge financing or any other third party.

Before July 1, 2022, any business may apply to the council for a guarantee loan participation as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(vii). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. No guarantee loan participations shall be issued on and after July 1, 2022. The council shall structure any guarantee loan participation so that in the event of default of any loan which is participated in under this subsection:

Liability shall be shared proportionally between the state and the lending institution in the same percentage as the source of the funding for the loan; and

The interest of the state and the lending institution shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the financing or any other third party.

Before July 1, 2022, any business may apply to the council for a loan guarantee as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(viii). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. No loan guarantees shall be issued on and after July 1, 2022. The council shall structure any loan guarantee so that in the event of default of any loan that is guaranteed under this subsection:

Liability to the state under the guarantee shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) per loan guaranteed or eighty percent (80%) of any net loan loss by the bank, whichever is less; and

The interest of the state and the lending institution shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the financing or other third party.

Any business may apply to the council for a Wyoming main street loan participation as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(ix). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. In the event of a default for any loan made under this subsection, liability shall be shared proportionately between the state and the lender in the same percentage as the source of the loan. The interest of the state and the lender shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the main street loan participation or any other third party.

Any business may apply to the council for a natural gas fueling infrastructure loan as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(x). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. In the event of a default, the state shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the natural gas fueling infrastructure loan or third party. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-12-303

, no interest or principal payments shall be due for the first two (2) years of the loan term. All deferred interest during the first two (2) years of the loan term shall accrue to the principal balance. All loans issued under this subsection shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) and after five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) in loans have been issued, no further loans shall be issued under this subsection without further legislative approval. Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to natural gas fueling infrastructure loans under this subsection. In evaluating applications for a natural gas fueling infrastructure loan, the council shall consider whether:

The geographic area in which the proposed natural gas fueling infrastructure will be located is currently served by existing natural gas fueling infrastructure; and

The location of the proposed natural gas fueling infrastructure has a significant number of government or private fleet vehicles with the potential to convert to natural gas.

Any business may apply to the council for a contract financing loan as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(xi). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. In the event of a default, the state shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the contract financing loan. The council shall not issue a loan under this subsection unless the business agrees to assign the proceeds of a contract to the council as collateral for the loan. The council shall not issue a loan under this subsection unless the business provides not less than two (2) letters from financial institutions denying an application or request for financing. Upon completion of the contract, the council shall retain sufficient proceeds of the contract used as collateral to retire the loan and any outstanding interest and shall remit any remaining proceeds to the business. All loans issued under this subsection shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the aggregate at any one (1) time. In evaluating applications for a contract financing loan under this subsection, the council shall consider whether the contract to be used as collateral will have sufficient proceeds to pay off the loan balance and the likelihood of the successful completion of the contract.

Any business or person seeking to purchase a business may apply to the council for a succession financing loan as defined in W.S. 9-12-301(a)(xii). The council shall prescribe the form and contents of the application. The council shall review each application and make a determination as soon as practicable. The council shall participate with a lending institution to make a succession financing loan to a business under this subsection, provided that the participation rate of the council shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total loan amount. The interest of the state and the lending institution shall have priority over any claim of the business receiving the succession financing loan or any other third party. The council shall not issue a loan under this subsection unless the business to be purchased and for which the loan is issued has been in operation for not less than seven (7) years directly proceeding the application for a loan. The council may require the person or business seeking the loan to pledge revenues from the business as collateral for the loan or for the repayment of the loan. In evaluating applications for a succession financing loan under this subsection, the council shall consider the financial health of the business and the person seeking to purchase the business, including whether the business will generate sufficient revenues to repay the loan.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-10-105; 1998, ch. 6, § 4; ch. 36, § 1; 2000, ch. 22, § 1; 2001, ch. 13, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 55, § 1; 2005, ch. 53, § 1; 2009, ch. 8, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 208; 2013 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “loan guarantees” in (b) and “loan guarantees and guarantee loan participations” in (b)(ii); added the last proviso in (b)(i); added (e) and (f); updated an internal reference, and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “(g)” for “(f)” in the introductory language of (a); in (b)(i), substituted “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)” for “two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00),” substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or,” added “or if the amount to a business for a Wyoming main street loan participation as provided under subsection (g) of this section does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);” and added (g).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (b)(iv), which read: “If the application for the loan or loan commitment is submitted on or after September 1, 1996.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in a substituted “(h)” for “(g)” following “subsections (c) through;” in (b)(i) added “or if the amount to a business
for a natural gas fueling infrastructure loan as provided under subsection (h) of this section does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total project cost or one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), whichever is less;” and added (h).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(i), deleted “or to a business for bridge financing as provided under subsection (d) of this section” following “ (c) of this section,” added “if the total amount to a business for bridge financing as provided under subsection (d) of this section does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)”, and substituted “two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)” for “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “(k)” for “(h)” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “not less than twenty percent (20%) of” for “at least equal to” in (a)(i); rewrote (b)(i), which read, “If the total amount to a single community development organization, or to a business for an economic disaster loan as provided under subsection (c) of this section, does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), if the total amount to a business for bridge financing as provided under subsection (d) of this section does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), if the total amount to state development organizations does not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000.00), if the amount to a business for a federally guaranteed loan as provided under subsection (e) of this section does not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000.00), if the amount to a business for a loan guarantee does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) per loan guaranteed or eighty percent (80%) of any net loan loss by the bank, whichever is less, if the amount to a business for a Wyoming main street loan participation as provided under subsection (g) of this section does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) or if the amount to a business for a natural gas fueling infrastructure loan as provided under subsection (h) of this section does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total project cost or one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), whichever is less;”; in (d), substituted “fifty-fifty (50-50)” for “bridge” in the first sentence, substituted” the” for “such” preceding “application” in the second sentence; in (e), added “Before July 1, 2022,” in the first sentence, added the fourth sentence, made a related change; in (f), added “Before July 1, 2022,” in the first sentence, added the fourth sentence, made a related change; and added (j) and (k).

§ 9-12-305.
Economic development enterprise fund account; deposits; continuous appropriation; loans.

Except for fees deposited in accordance with W.S. 9-12-302(b), all repayments of principal and interest to the state in connection with loans made under this article and other funds as appropriated by the legislature for the challenge loan program shall be deposited into the economic development enterprise account within the revolving investment fund. All funds in the account may be used for and are continuously appropriated for loans authorized to be made under this article. Funds within the account may also be transferred upon direction of the governor to the large project account within the revolving investment fund if required to meet loans or loan guarantees approved under W.S.

9-12-308

. The total principal balance of outstanding loans shall not exceed the amounts appropriated by the legislature plus interest accrued and collected less any losses of loan principal or interest.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-10-106; 1998, ch. 6, § 4; 2014 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 7, 2014; 2016 ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 109, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

added the third sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 46, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 7, 2014.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “account within the revolving investment fund created by 2014 Wyoming Session Law, Chapter 46” for “account created by 2014 Senate File 97 as enacted into law.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “revolving investment fund if required” for “revolving investment fund created by 2014 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 46 if required” and “guarantees approved under W.S.

9-12-308

” for “guarantees approved by the state loan and investment board under that law.”

§ 9-12-306.
Audit; report.

The director of the state department of audit or his designee shall annually examine the loan program created under this article and submit his report of examination to the governor, the legislature and the council. This examination shall include a financial and compliance audit of the council’s operations, and such financial audit of borrowers under this article as the examiner deems appropriate. As a condition of any loan under this article, the borrower shall agree to allow the examiner to examine its books and records. The examiner shall treat all proprietary information received in the course of the examination or audit as confidential.

On or before July 15 of each year, the council shall submit a written report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee reviewing rules adopted by the council during the reporting period, presenting a portfolio of loans made under the program and under W.S.

9-12-308

showing the number of jobs created as a result of loans in the portfolio including whether the jobs are permanent or temporary and presenting a risk analysis of the portfolio of loans prepared by the state banking commissioner. The report, portfolio of loans and risk analysis required under this subsection shall be public records. The risk analysis prepared by the state banking commissioner shall not be subject to the limitations of W.S.

9-1-512

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; 1998, ch. 6, §§ 4, 5; ch. 36, § 1; 2001, ch. 13, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 2020 ch. 109, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “under the program and under W.S.

9-12-308

showing the number of jobs created as a result of loans in the portfolio including whether the jobs are permanent or temporary and presenting” for “under the program and presenting.”

§ 9-12-307.
Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement to the council in connection with an application under this article or article 9 of this chapter is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-10-108; 1998, ch. 6, § 4; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 181, § 2.

The 2006 amendment

deleted “or who violates W.S. 9-12-302(c)” following “article.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Editor's notes. —

W.S. 9-12-302(c) was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.